Tennessee, session 114, SB2491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Safe Access to Schools and
Child Services Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A state agency or local agency shall not condition enrollment, attendance, or
the receipt of services for a child who is under eighteen (18) years of age on the
disclosure of the child's immigration status, except as explicitly required by federal or
state law or court order.
(b) This section does not limit compliance with federal immigration law or limit
cooperation with federal authorities as required by law.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Local agency" means any county, municipality, branch or agency of
a county or municipality, public utility, utility district, entity created pursuant to any
interlocal agreement, or any other political subdivision thereof, and includes an
LEA, public school, and public charter school; and
(2) "State agency" means each state board, commission, committee,
department, office, or any other unit of state government.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 37, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
SB2491
012253
- 1 -

(a) The department shall not condition enrollment, attendance, or the receipt of
services for a child who is under eighteen (18) years of age on the disclosure of the
child's immigration status, except as explicitly required by federal or state law or court
order.
(b) This section does not limit compliance with federal immigration law or limit
cooperation with federal authorities as required by law.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A state agency or local agency shall not condition enrollment, attendance, or
the receipt of services for a child who is under eighteen (18) years of age on the
disclosure of the child's immigration status, except as explicitly required by federal or
state law or court order.
(b) This section does not limit compliance with federal immigration law or limit
cooperation with federal authorities as required by law.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Local agency" means any county, municipality, branch or agency of
a county or municipality, public utility, utility district, entity created pursuant to any
interlocal agreement, or any other political subdivision thereof, and includes an
LEA, public school, and public charter school; and
(2) "State agency" means each state board, commission, committee,
department, office, or any other unit of state government.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 71, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The department shall not condition enrollment, attendance, or the receipt of
services for a child who is under eighteen (18) years of age on the disclosure of the
- 2 - 012253

child's immigration status, except as explicitly required by federal or state law or court
order.
(b) This section does not limit compliance with federal immigration law or limit
cooperation with federal authorities as required by law.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 012253